Utah statutes.
39-1-53.   Military units not to leave state.

No military unit of the Army or Air National Guard, unless called into the service of the United States, shall leave the state with arms and equipment without the consent of the commander in chief, and any person causing any unit to so leave the state is guilty of a misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 61, 1963 General Session

